Maryland, session 2026, HB0407.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
26–102.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0407*

HOUSE BILL 407
This title applies only in Prince George’s County.
26–901.
(a) There is a Class A beer, wine, and liquor license.
(b) (1) The license authorizes the license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor
at retail at the place described in the license.
(2) The license holder shall sell the beer, wine, or liquor in a sealed package
or container that may not be opened or its contents consumed on the licensed premises.
(c) A license under this section may not be issued for a drugstore unless the
applicant:
(1) has been doing business at the location applied for in the license for at
least 1 year before the date of the application for the license;
(2) is the assignee of a business established for at least 1 year before the
date of the application for the license at the location applied for; or
(3) has been engaged in the retail drug business for at least 3 years.
(D) (1) A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY NOT BE
TRANSFERRED OR SOLD TO ANOTHER PERSON OR LOCATION.
(2) IF A LICENSE ISSUED UNDER THIS SECTION EXPIRES OR THE
LICENSE HOLDER NO LONGER WISHES TO HOLD THE LICENSE, THE LICENSE HOLDER
SHALL RETURN THE LICENSE TO THE BOARD.
(3) THE BOARD MAY NOT REISSUE A LICENSE THAT HAS BEEN
RETURNED TO THE BOARD IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SUBSECTION.
[(d)] (E) The annual license fee is $910.
26–1702.
(a) The Board may not approve the transfer of a license from one location to
another:
(1) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, for at least 2 years
after the issuance of a new license; and
(2) unless the Board determines that:

HOUSE BILL 407 3
(i) the transfer to the new location is necessary to accommodate the
public; and
(ii) the transferee has complied with the residency requirements
specified in § 26–1406(c) of this title.
(b) Subject to the approval of the Board, a receiver or trustee may transfer
ownership and location of a license for the benefit of creditors of a license holder within 6
months after:
(1) appointment as the receiver or trustee; or
(2) the death of the license holder.
(c) (1) The Board may approve a transfer of location or ownership within 2
years after a transfer of location has been authorized.
(2) This paragraph does not prohibit a transfer of ownership for
continuance of a business in the same location, unless there has been a transfer of location
for the license within 2 years.
(d) A transfer of a license in accordance with a security agreement is subject to
approval by the Board like any other license transfer, except that the written consent and
cooperation of the existing license holder is not required.
(e) (1) In addition to any other notice required under this article, the Board
shall provide notice of the time, date, and location of a hearing, as soon as practicable after
a hearing for a license transfer is scheduled, to all municipalities, civic associations,
homeowners’ associations, and condominium associations that:
(i) are within 1 mile of the location of the proposed place of business
of the applicant; and
(ii) request to receive notice of hearings by signing up on a registry
on the Board’s website.
(2) A municipality, civic association, homeowners’ association, or
condominium association that requests to receive notice of hearings under paragraph (1)(ii)
of this subsection may elect to receive written or electronic notice.
(F) THE BOARD MAY NOT APPROVE THE TRANSFER OR SALE OF A CLASS A
BEER, WINE, AND LIQUOR LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.